Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-623.03
Failure to file audit; effect.

If any public power district fails to file a copy of an audit within the time prescribed in section 70-623, then its books, records, and financial affairs shall, within one hundred eighty days after the close of the fiscal year of the district, be audited by a certified public accountant or firm of accountants selected by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The cost of the audit shall be paid by the district. A copy of such audit shall be placed and kept on file at the principal place of business of the district.

Laws 1945, c. 160, § 1, p. 523;

Laws 1993, LB 310, § 10.